Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-509
Public service commissioners; districts; qualifications; partisan ballot; terms.

(1) The State of Nebraska is divided into five public service commissioner districts as provided and described in sections 75-101.01 and 75-101.02. A candidate for the office of public service commissioner shall meet the qualifications found in section 75-101. The commissioners shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

(2) Each public service commissioner shall be elected for a term of six years. One public service commissioner from public service commissioner district number one and one public service commissioner from public service commissioner district number three shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1994 and each six years thereafter. One public service commissioner from public service commissioner district number four and one public service commissioner from public service commissioner district number five shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1992 and each six years thereafter. One public service commissioner from public service commissioner district number two shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1996 and each six years thereafter.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 105;

Laws 2001, LB 855, § 1.